el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Βοηθήματα εκπαίδευσης κατοικίδιων ζώων: Κλίκερ εκπαίδευσης & δοσομετρητές λιχουδιών για κατοικίδια ζώα; Κάτοχοι μαξιλαριών εκπαίδευσης κατοικίδιων ζώων; Μαξιλάρια εκπαίδευσης κατοικίδιων ζώων; Σπρέι & διαλύματα εκπαίδευσης κατοικίδιων ζώων
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Hjälpmedel för husdjursträning: Klickers och belöningsdosor för husdjursträning; Matthållare för husdjursträning; Träningsdynor för husdjur; Sprejer och lösningar för husdjursträning
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Matériel de dressage pour animaux de compagnie: Clickers et distributeurs de friandises pour le dressage des animaux de compagnie; Supports de tapis éducateur pour animaux de compagnie; Tapis éducateur pour animaux de compagnie; Sprays et solutions pour le dressage des animaux de compagnie
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Eğitimine Yardımcı Gereçler: Evcil Hayvan Eğitimi Clicker'ı ve Ödül Dağıtıcılar; Evcil Hayvan Eğitim Pedi Tutucuları; Evcil Hayvan Eğitim Pedleri; Evcil Hayvan Eğitim Spreyleri ve Solüsyonları
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Hỗ trợ đào tạo thú nuôi: Dụng cụ phát âm thanh dùng để huấn luyện và dụng cụ đựng đồ ăn thưởng; Khay vệ sinh cho thú cưng; Thảm chùi chân để huấn luyện thú cưng; Dung dịch tập vệ sinh cho thú cưng
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za šolanje hišnih ljubljenčkov: Klikerji in podajalniki priboljškov za šolanje hišnih ljubljenčkov; Držala za podloge za navajanje na sobno čistočo; Podloge za navajanje na sobno čistočo; Razpršila in sredstva za navajanje na sobno čistočo
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Pomůcky pro trénink domácích zvířat: Dávkovače pamlsků pro výcvik domácích zvířat; Držáky plenek pro psy; Toaletní podložky pro domácí zvířata; Tréninkové spreje a roztoky pro výcvik domácích zvířat
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikin koulutusvälineet: Lemmikin naksuttimet ja namiautomaatit; Lemmikin pissasuojan alusta; Lemmikin pissa-alustat; Lemmikin koulutussuihkeet ja -seokset
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Hilfsmittel für Tierausbildung: Clicker & Belohnungsspielzeug für Tierausbildung; Pad-Unterlagen für Tierausbildung; Bodenschutz & Unterlagen; Sprays & Lösungen für Tierausbildung
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 훈련 장비: 반려동물 훈련용 클리커/간식통; 반려동물 배변 패드 홀더; 반려동물 배변 패드; 반려동물 훈련 스프레이/용액
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Háziállat-kiképző segédeszközök: Háziállat-kiképző csattogtatók és jutalomfalat-adagolók; Háziállat-kiképző alátéttartók; Háziállat-kiképző alátétek; Háziállat-kiképző spray-k és oldószerek
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Pomoce do szkolenia zwierząt: Klikery i dozowniki nagród; Podkładki i pojemniki na maty szkoleniowe; Maty treningowe dla zwierząt; Spraye i płyny szkoleniowe
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Pet Training Aids: Pet Training Clickers & Treat Dispensers; Pet Training Pad Holders; Pet Training Pads; Pet Training Sprays & Solutions
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Suporte para adestramento de animais: Porta-petiscos e clickers para adestramento de animais; Suportes de almofadas de adestramento de animais; Tapetes de adestramento para animais; Soluções e sprays para adestramento de animais
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Treningsutstyr for husdyr: Treningsklikkere og godtebeholdere for husdyr; Holdere til hustreningsputer; Hustreningsputer; Sprayer og løsninger for hustrening
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Hjælpemidler til træning af kæledyr: Klikkere og godbidsdispensere til træning af kæledyr; Holdere til træningspuder til kæledyr; Trænemåtte til kæledyr; Sprays til træning af kæledyr
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Apoios ao treino para animais de estimação: Distribuidores de snacks e clickers de treino para animais de estimação; Fixadores de resguardos para animais de estimação; Resguardos para animais de estimação; Soluções e sprays para animais de estimação
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Hulpmiddelen voor zindelijkheidstraining huisdieren: Klikkers en beloningsdispensers voor het africhten van dieren; Hoezen voor zindelijkheids-trainingsmatten; Trainingsdoekjes voor huisdieren; Sprays en oplossingen voor het africhten van dieren
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Materiali per l'addestramento dei cani: Clicker e portasnack per l'addestramento dei cani; Portatappetini per l'addestramento dei cani; Tappetini igienici per cani; Spray e soluzioni per l'addestramento dei cani
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Kits de adiestramiento para mascotas: Dispensadores de premios y contadores para adiestrar mascotas; Protectores de empapadores para mascotas; Empapadores para mascotas; Soluciones y espráis de adiestramiento para mascotas
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Помощни средства за обучение на домашни любимци: Тренировъчни кликери и диспенсъри за лакомства; Поставки за подложки за обучение; Подложки за обучение за домашни любимци; Спрейове и разтвори за обучение на домашни любимци
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์ฝึกสัตว์เลี้ยง: คลิกเกอร์สำหรับฝึกสัตว์เลี้ยงและเครื่องจ่ายอาหารสัตว์; ที่ใส่แผ่นรองสำหรับฝึกสัตว์เลี้ยง; แผ่นฝึกการขับถ่ายสัตว์เลี้ยง; สเปรย์และน้ำยาฝึกสัตว์เลี้ยง
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > ペットしつけ用品: ペット訓練用クリッカー・給餌器; ペット用トレーニングパッドホルダー; ペット用トイレシート; ペットしつけ用スプレー・しつけ液
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Pomagala za dresuru kućnih ljubimaca: Klikeri i dozatori poslastica za dresuru kućnih ljubimaca; Držači podloga za dresuru kućnih ljubimaca; Podloge za dresuru kućnih ljubimaca; Sprejevi i sredstva za dresuru kućnih ljubimaca
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для дрессировки и приучения к туалету: Кликеры и сумочки для лакомств; Лотки для впитывающих пеленок; Впитывающие пеленки; Спреи и растворы для приучения к туалету
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Naminių gyvūnų dresavimo priemonės: Naminių gyvūnų dresavimo spragtukai ir skanėstų dozatoriai; Naminių gyvūnų dresavimo kilimėlių laikikliai; Naminių gyvūnų dresavimo kilimėliai; Naminių gyvūnų dresavimo purškalai ir tirpalai
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Pomôcky na výcvik domácich miláčikov: Tréningové dávkovače pamlskov pre domácich miláčikov; Držiaky tréningových podložiek pre domácich miláčikov; Tréningové podložky pre domácich miláčikov; Tréningové spreje a riešenia pre domácich miláčikov
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 宠物训练辅助用品: 宠物训练响片与喂食器; 宠物训练垫架; 宠物训导尿垫; 宠物训练喷雾/溶液
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 寵物訓練輔助用具: 寵物訓練響片和零食容器; 寵物尿墊盆; 寵物訓練墊; 寵物訓練噴霧
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru dresajul animalelor de companie: Aparate de dresaj și de distribuire de recompense pentru animale de companie; Suporturi articole de dresaj pentru animale de companie; Covorașe pentru dresajul animalelor de companie; Sprayuri și soluții pentru dresajul animalelor de companie